ko: 바느질용 원단 수: 10카운트; 11카운트; 12카운트; 13카운트; 14카운트; 15카운트; 16카운트; 18카운트; 20카운트; 22카운트; 24카운트; 25카운트; 27카운트; 28카운트; 30카운트; 32카운트; 36카운트; 40카운트; 6카운트; 8카운트; 기타
nl: Aantal borduurstoffen: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Overig
vi: Số lượng vải thêu: 10 lỗ; 11 lỗ; 12 lỗ; 13 lỗ; 14 lỗ; 15 lỗ; 16 lỗ; 18 lỗ; 20 lỗ; 22 lỗ; 24 lỗ; 25 lỗ; 27 lỗ; 28 lỗ; 30 lỗ; 32 lỗ; 36 lỗ; 40 lỗ; 6 lỗ; 8 lỗ; Khác
nb: Antall nålarbeidsstoffer: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Annet
lt-LT: Rankdarbių audinio tankis: 10 gijų; 11 gijų; 12 gijų; 13 gijų; 14 gijų; 15 gijų; 16 gijų; 18 gijų; 20 gijų; 22 gijų; 24 gijų; 25 gijų; 27 gijų; 28 gijų; 30 gijų; 32 gijų; 36 gijų; 40 gijų; 6 gijų; 8 gijų; Kita
hu: Kézműves anyagok száma: 10-es; 11-es; 12-es; 13-as; 14-es; 15-ös; 16-os; 18-as; 20-as; 22-es; 24-es; 25-ös; 27-es; 28-as; 30-as; 32-es; 36-os; 40-es; 6-os; 8-as; Egyéb
sv: Antal tyger för handarbete: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tecidos para artesanato com agulha número: Trama 10; Trama 11; Trama 12; Trama 13; Trama 14; Trama 15; Trama 16; Trama 18; Trama 20; Trama 22; Trama 24; Trama 25; Trama 27; Trama 28; Trama 30; Trama 32; Trama 36; Trama 40; Trama 6; Trama 8; Outro
it: Numero di tessuti per ricamo: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 25 count; 27 count; 28 count; 30 count; 32 count; 36 count; 40 count; 6 count; 8 count; Altro
hr-HR: Broj tkanina za vezenje: Gustoća 10; Gustoća 11; Gustoća 12; Gustoća 13; Gustoća 14; Gustoća 15; Gustoća 16; Gustoća 18; Gustoća 20; Gustoća 22; Gustoća 24; Gustoća 25; Gustoća 27; Gustoća 28; Gustoća 30; Gustoća 32; Gustoća 36; Gustoća 40; Gustoća 6; Gustoća 8; Ostalo
sl-SI: Število blaga za ročna dela: Gostota 10; Gostota 11; Gostota 12; Gostota 13; Gostota 14; Gostota 15; Gostota 16; Gostota 18; Gostota 20; Gostota 22; Gostota 24; Gostota 25; Gostota 27; Gostota 28; Gostota 30; Gostota 32; Gostota 36; Gostota 40; Gostota 6; Gostota 8; Drugo
zh-TW: 針線工藝布料支數: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 25 count; 27 count; 28 count; 30 count; 32 count; 36 count; 40 count; 6 count; 8 count; 其他
pt-PT: Número de tecidos para bordado: 10 pontos; 11 pontos; 12 pontos; 13 pontos; 14 pontos; 15 pontos; 16 pontos; 18 pontos; 20 pontos; 22 pontos; 24 pontos; 25 pontos; 27 pontos; 28 pontos; 30 pontos; 32 pontos; 36 pontos; 40 pontos; 6 pontos; 8 pontos; Outro
bg-BG: Брой платове за ръкоделие с игла: 10-каунт; 11-каунт; 12-каунт; 13-каунт; 14-каунт; 15-каунт; 16-каунт; 18-каунт; 20-каунт; 22-каунт; 24-каунт; 25-каунт; 27-каунт; 28-каунт; 30-каунт; 32-каунт; 36-каунт; 40-каунт; 6-каунт; 8-каунт; Друго
en: Number of needlecraft fabrics: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Other
tr: İğne işi kumaşı iplik sayısı: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 25 count; 27 count; 28 count; 30 count; 32 count; 36 count; 40 count; 6 count; 8 count; Diğer
ja: 手芸用生地の数: 10カウント; 11カウント; 12カウント; 13カウント; 14カウント; 15カウント; 16カウント; 18カウント; 20カウント; 22カウント; 24カウント; 25カウント; 27カウント; 28カウント; 30カウント; 32カウント; 36カウント; 40カウント; 6カウント; 8カウント; その他
el: Αριθμός υφασμάτων κεντήματος: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Άλλο
pl: Gęstość tkaniny do haftu: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Inne
da: Trådtal for håndarbejdsstof: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Andet
es: Cantidad de telas para bordado: 10 puntos; 11 puntos; 12 puntos; 13 puntos; 14 puntos; 15 puntos; 16 puntos; 18 puntos; 20 puntos; 22 puntos; 24 puntos; 25 puntos; 27 puntos; 28 puntos; 30 puntos; 32 puntos; 36 puntos; 40 puntos; 6 puntos; 8 puntos; Otro
fr: Densité du tissu pour ouvrages à l’aiguille: 10 points; 11 points; 12 points; 13 points; 14 points; 15 points; 16 points; 18 points; 20 points; 22 points; 24 points; 25 points; 27 points; 28 points; 30 points; 32 points; 36 points; 40 points; 6 points; 8 points; Autre
ro-RO: Numărul de materiale textile pentru lucru cu acul: 10 ochiuri; 11 ochiuri; 12 ochiuri; 13 ochiuri; 14 ochiuri; 15 ochiuri; 16 ochiuri; 18 ochiuri; 20 ochiuri; 22 ochiuri; 24 ochiuri; 25 ochiuri; 27 ochiuri; 28 ochiuri; 30 ochiuri; 32 ochiuri; 36 ochiuri; 40 ochiuri; 6 ochiuri; 8 ochiuri; Altele
th: จำนวนผ้าสำหรับงานเย็บปักถักร้อย: 10 เคาต์; 11 เคาต์; 12 เคาต์; 13 เคาต์; 14 เคาต์; 15 เคาต์; 16 เคาต์; 18 เคาต์; 20 เคาต์; 22 เคาต์; 24 เคาต์; 25 เคาต์; 27 เคาต์; 28 เคาต์; 30 เคาต์; 32 เคาต์; 36 เคาต์; 40 เคาต์; 6 เคาต์; 8 เคาต์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Číslo látky na ručné práce: Veľkosť 10; Veľkosť 11; Veľkosť 12; Veľkosť 13; Veľkosť 14; Veľkosť 15; Veľkosť 16; Veľkosť 18; Veľkosť 20; Veľkosť 22; Veľkosť 24; Veľkosť 25; Veľkosť 27; Veľkosť 28; Veľkosť 30; Veľkosť 32; Veľkosť 36; Veľkosť 40; Veľkosť 6; Veľkosť 8; Iné
cs: Počet látek na vyšívání: 10 ct; 11 ct; 12 ct; 13 ct; 14 ct; 15 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 24 ct; 25 ct; 27 ct; 28 ct; 30 ct; 32 ct; 36 ct; 40 ct; 6 ct; 8 ct; Ostatní
de: Anzahl der Handarbeitsstoffe: 10-Count; 11-Count; 12-Count; 13-Count; 14-Count; 15-Count; 16-Count; 18-Count; 20-Count; 22-Count; 24-Count; 25-Count; 27-Count; 28-Count; 30-Count; 32-Count; 36-Count; 40-Count; 6-Count; 8-Count; Andere
fi: Kirjontakankaiden lukumäärä: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 25-count; 27-count; 28-count; 30-count; 32-count; 36-count; 40-count; 6-count; 8-count; Muu
ru: Плотность ткани для рукоделия: 10 каунт; 11 каунт; 12 каунт; 13 каунт; 14 каунт; 15 каунт; 16 каунт; 18 каунт; 20 каунт; 22 каунт; 24 каунт; 25 каунт; 27 каунт; 28 каунт; 30 каунт; 32 каунт; 36 каунт; 40 каунт; 6 каунт; 8 каунт; Другое
zh-CN: 刺绣面料数量: 10 支; 11 支; 12 支; 13 支; 14 支; 15 支; 16 支; 18 支; 20 支; 22 支; 24 支; 25 支; 27 支; 28 支; 30 支; 32 支; 36 支; 40 支; 6 支; 8 支; 其他